Utah statutes.
9-7-209.   Depository libraries.
(1)  Upon application, a library in this state may be designated as a
depository library by the division.
(2)  To be designated as a depository library, a library shall contract with
the division to:
(a)  provide adequate facilities for the storage and use of state
publications;
(b)  render reasonable service without charge to patrons; and
(c)  provide reasonable access to state publications.
(3)  A depository library shall receive at least one copy of all state
publications issued by state agencies in a physical format.
(4)  Each depository library shall have electronic network access to the
bibliographic records and the state publications deposited with the division
for the purposes of local preservation and providing local access.
